Georgia statutes. 
Street name sign expenses not legitimate. - As the usual and general purpose for street name signs is to facilitate individuals in gaining directions and is not, strictly speaking, a measure directed at controlling or accommodating the general flow of traffic, street name signs are not a legitimate expenditure under this section. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

Bush hog mower expenses not legitimate. - Since bush hog mowers for rights of way and litter barrels do not have as a primary function the direct control or accommodation of the flow of traffic, although mowers and barrels may indirectly, or as an auxiliary purpose, facilitate the flow of traffic, the mowers and barrels would not be qualified expenditures within the strict construction of this section. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 108, 470 et seq.

C.J.S. - 81A C.J.S., States, § 404 et seq.

36-40-42. Certificate of eligibility for grant; submission; form; execution and attestation; penalty for signing false certificate.

Statute text

(a) Each municipal corporation, as defined in Code Section 36-40-40, shall submit to the Office of the State Treasurer a certificate showing the number of regular meetings held within the preceding 12 months by the governing body of the municipal corporation and stating that taxes or fees were levied within the 12 months preceding the execution of such certificate for the operation of the municipal government.

(b) The certificate shall be substantially in the following form:

CERTIFICATE

"The undersigned, Mayor (Chairman of the Commission) of (Official

Corporate Name), does hereby certify that ____________________________________

regular meetings of the governing body were held during the past 12 months and that taxes or fees were levied during the past 12 months for the operation of the government of (Official Corporate Name). The municipal treasurer or other official or officials authorized to receive municipal

funds is (are) _____________________________________________________________.

__________________________ __________________________________________

Date Mayor (Chairman of Commission)

Attest:

______________________________

Clerk"

(c) The certificate shall be executed by the highest elective official, whether designated as "mayor" or by some other term or as the "chairman of the commission" in those municipal corporations having a commission form of government, and shall be attested by the clerk. The name of the municipal corporation used in the certificate shall be its official corporate name. The name of the municipal treasurer or other official or officials authorized to receive municipal funds shall be listed in the certificate and the instrument transferring funds to the municipal corporation shall be payable to such treasurer or other official or officials as listed in the certificate.

(d) The information contained in the certificate shall constitute the basis upon which the Office of the State Treasurer shall make the distribution of funds under this article.

(e) Any person who willfully and knowingly signs a certificate containing false information shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 458, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 522 et seq.

36-40-43. When certificate to be filed; effect of failure to file certificate.

Statute text

Prior to June 1 of each year, a certificate shall be filed which shall be the basis upon which payments shall be made of funds made available under this article for the immediately succeeding fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30. If no certificate is filed within the time limitation specified in this Code section, the municipality shall not be entitled to and shall not be paid any funds for the applicable period and such municipality shall not be included in the formula for determining the amount of the grants as provided in Code Section 36-40-44.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 458, § 5.)

36-40-44. Computation of allocation of funds.

Statute text

(a) To the extent that funds are made available by any law for the purposes set out in Code Section 36-40-41, the Office of the State Treasurer is authorized and directed to grant such funds to the municipal corporations of this state, as defined in Code Section 36-40-40, on the following basis:

(1) An amount equal to five ten-thousandths of the total sum available at any given time for grants under this article shall be first determined, and each municipal corporation whose population is 500 or less shall receive as its total grant such portion of the five ten-thousandths amount so determined as its population proportionately bears to 500. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (1) grants."

(2) The amount remaining for distribution after deducting the total amount of paragraph (1) grants shall then be divided by the total population of all municipal corporations whose population exceeds 500, to arrive at a per capita amount. Such per capita amount shall be multiplied, in turn, by the population of each municipal corporation whose population exceeds 500. Any such municipal corporation whose population when so multiplied equals less than the five ten-thousandths amount as first determined under paragraph (1) of this Code section shall receive as its total grant the five ten-thousandths amount. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (2) grants."

(3) The amount remaining for distribution after deducting the total amount of paragraph (1) and paragraph (2) grants shall then be divided by the total population of all remaining municipal corporations (eliminating those receiving paragraph (1) and paragraph (2) grants), to arrive at a per capita amount for such remaining municipal corporations. The per capita amount as so determined shall then be multiplied by the population of each such remaining municipal corporation to arrive at its respective grant. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (3) grants."

(b) Whenever the term "population" is used in this article, it means population as determined according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

(c) The computation and payments of individual municipal grants as called for in this article shall be made by the Office of the State Treasurer.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 458, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 524, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Distribution of funds on basis of 1960 and 1970 censuses. - In distributing grants to municipalities for fiscal year 1970-71, the state treasurer should distribute one-half of funds appropriated on the basis of the 1960 United States decennial census and the remaining one-half on the basis of the 1970 census. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Computation of allocation for city qualifying under 1970 census. - A municipality which did not qualify under the 1960 United States census, but which does qualify under the 1970 United States census, would receive, when applicable, 5/10,000ths of the amount which is available for distribution under the 1970 United States census; this would be one-half of the total amount appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

36-40-45. Payment and use of funds.

Statute text

Funds distributed under this article by the Office of the State Treasurer shall be paid to the municipal corporation in the name of the municipal treasurer or other official or officials authorized to receive municipal funds, as listed in the certificate required by Code Section 36-40-42. Such funds shall be expended by the municipal corporation only for the purposes prescribed in Code Section 36-40-41.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 458, § 6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

36-40-46. Submission of annual audit; adjustment of fund distribution; effect of failure to submit audit; procedure when municipal corporation has no annual audit.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of each municipal corporation shall submit to the state auditor a copy of its regular annual audit not later than six months after the end of the fiscal year for which the audit was made. The state auditor shall compare the amount of funds distributed to each municipal corporation in such year under this article against the amount of funds expended by each municipal corporation in such year for the purposes authorized by such Code sections. If the state auditor determines that the amount so expended is less than the amount distributed, he shall certify such amount to the Office of the State Treasurer, which shall deduct and withhold the certified amount from the next funds to be distributed to the offending municipal corporation under this article. If, however, a municipal corporation expending less than the amount distributed to it certifies at the time of the submission of its audit that it is accumulating such funds for a specified allowable purpose and submits proof of the deposit or investment of such funds, then such municipal corporation will be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this Code section, except that the amount of such funds shall be added to the amount of funds distributed to such municipal corporation in the next succeeding year or years for the purpose of making the comparison and determination provided for in this Code section.

(b) Upon certification by the state auditor to the Office of the State Treasurer that the audit required by this Code section from any municipal corporation has not been received, the Office of the State Treasurer shall not distribute any further funds under this article to such offending municipal corporation until the state auditor again certifies to the Office of the State Treasurer that the delinquent audit has been filed. It shall be the duty of the state auditor to make such certification when no audit is received or when a delinquent audit is received.

(c) If any municipal corporation is not now having a regular annual audit made of its funds, the Office of the State Treasurer shall not distribute any further funds under this article to such municipal corporation until either:

(1) An audit has been made and submitted to the state auditor; or

(2) The mayor or clerk submits a statement under oath to the state auditor stating:

(A) That the municipal corporation does not now have a regular annual audit;

(B) That the funds received under this article have been deposited in and disbursed from a separate account; and

(C) That the funds have been expended for the purposes authorized by this article.

(d) Upon the request of the Governor or the commissioner of transportation, the state auditor is authorized to audit the books and records of each municipal corporation to verify the accuracy of the report so filed with him and to ensure that the expenditure of such funds has been made for the purposes intended.

History

(Ga. L. 1966, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Subsection (c) of this section requires that mayor or clerk submit a statement under oath stating that municipality does not have a regular annual audit, that the funds received under this act have been deposited in and disbursed from a separate account, and that the funds have been expended for the purposes authorized by this act. In the absence of the foregoing, the state treasurer is not authorized to distribute any further funds to a municipality, and in all probability any distributions to a municipality not meeting alternatives stated in this section are questionable. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-116.

Determination of compliance. - Fiscal Division of the Department of Administrative Services (now the Office of the State Treasurer) is required to make some determination as to whether municipality is now having regular annual audit of its funds, and if not, whether any of the two specified alternatives are being complied with. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-116.

——————————

CHAPTER 41

URBAN RESIDENTIAL FINANCE AUTHORITIES FOR LARGE MUNICIPALITIES

Sec.

36-41-1. Short title.

36-41-2. Legislative findings and declaration of public necessity.

36-41-3. Definitions.

36-41-4. Creation of authority; governing board; filing of resolutions with Secretary of State; filling of vacancies on board; officers; compensation of members of board; promulgation of rules and regulations.

36-41-5. Powers of authority generally; establishment of administrative guidelines for determination of eligibility.

36-41-6. Loans to qualified housing sponsors or eligible households; loans to lending institutions.

36-41-7. Purchase of mortgages or security interests or participations therein.

36-41-8. Issuance of revenue bonds; use and commitment of funds; form and contents of bonds; execution; sale; temporary bonds; refunding bonds; trust indenture; validation of bonds; bonds as authorized investments.

36-41-9. Pledge of assets for payment of bonds.

36-41-10. Bonds or obligations not public debt.

36-41-11. Tax exemptions.

36-41-12. Competition with Georgia Housing and Finance Authority.

36-41-13. Annual audit.

Annotations

Cross references. - Housing, T. 8, C. 3.

Clearance and rehabilitation of blighted areas, § 8-4-1 et seq.

36-41-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Urban Residential Finance Authorities Act for Large Municipalities."

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 1.)

36-41-2. Legislative findings and declaration of public necessity.

Statute text

It is found, determined, and declared:

(1) That there exists within the large municipalities of the state a serious shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary housing which a significant portion of the persons and families residing or desiring to reside in such municipalities can afford. This shortage is inimical to the safety, health, and welfare of the residents of this state and the sound growth of its large municipalities. The cost of financing the ownership and rehabilitation of housing in such municipalities is a major factor affecting the ability of a person to obtain decent and safe housing therein. In order to remedy such housing shortages, it is necessary to implement a public program to reduce the cost of financing for the acquisition and rehabilitation of housing, in order to make the acquisition of housing feasible for all persons and families residing or desiring to reside in the large municipalities of the state;

(2) That it is necessary and essential that public corporations be created for such large municipalities of the state directly, or indirectly through qualified lending institutions, to make loans at rates below market to finance either the acquisition or rehabilitation or both of residential housing and to acquire mortgages in order to encourage investment in and upgrade urban areas;

(3) That it is necessary and in the best interests of the state to provide loans at rates below market for the acquisition and rehabilitation of housing which will:

(A) Provide for and promote the public health, safety, and welfare in the large municipalities of the state;

(B) Reduce unemployment and encourage the increase of industrial and commercial activities and economic development in the large municipalities;

(C) Provide for the efficient and well-planned growth and development of the large municipalities, including the elimination and prevention of slum areas and blight, and for the proper coordination of industrial facilities with public services, mass transportation facilities, and residential development, by providing an incentive for home ownership within the geographical limits of the large municipalities;

(D) Assist persons and families in acquiring and owning decent, safe, and sanitary housing which they can afford within the geographic limits of the large municipalities;

(E) Promote the integration of families of varying economic means in the large municipalities; and

(F) Preserve and increase the tax base of the large municipalities; and

(4) Accordingly, that it is a valid public purpose, as a matter of public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, to assist in providing financing for the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing in the large municipalities of the state and that the creation of public corporations and instrumentalities of the state is the most feasible method by which the state can accomplish such public purposes.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 556, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

36-41-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Authority" means any public corporation created by this chapter.

(2) "Bonds" means any bonds, including refunding bonds, or any notes or other obligations authorized to be issued by an authority pursuant to this chapter.

(3) "Eligible household" means any household which does not have sufficient income to afford to pay the amounts at which private enterprise, without federally aided, state aided, or authority aided mortgages, is providing a substantial supply of decent, safe, and sanitary housing and which satisfies the income limitations set by each authority in administrative guidelines and procedures established pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 36-41-5.

(4) "Federally aided mortgage" means any mortgage insured or guaranteed by an agency of the United States government or any mortgage receiving special benefits, directly or indirectly, under any federal laws designated specifically to encourage the purchase of housing.

(5) "Governing body" means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of a large municipality.

(6) "Household" shall have that meaning specified by the United States Bureau of the Census in its 1980 census.

(7) "Income" shall have that meaning specified by the United States Bureau of the Census in its 1980 census.

(8) "Lending institution" means any bank or trust company, savings and loan association, building and loan association, savings bank, insurance company, mortgage banker, mortgage broker, or other financial institution, any governmental agency, or any holding company for any of the foregoing. Such lending institution shall have a place of business in this state and shall be authorized to do business in this state.

(9) "Median household income" shall have that meaning used in the United States decennial census for the Metropolitan Statistical Area of the particular municipality activating the particular authority as adjusted from time to time by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(10) "Mortgage" means a deed to secure debt, together with the promissory note, the repayment of which is secured by such deed to secure debt, which is held by either the authority or a lending institution, which deed to secure debt encumbers either a fee simple or leasehold estate located within the geographic boundaries of a large municipality activating the authority and improved by residential housing.

(11) "Municipality" means any municipal corporation of this state having a population of 350,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

(12) "Nonprofit housing corporation" means a nonprofit or charitable private corporation providing safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations to persons of low income in such manner as to be essentially similar in operation and function to any authority or housing authority essential under this chapter.

(13) "Qualified housing sponsor" means an entity, whether organized for profit or not, meeting criteria established by the authority, which has undertaken to provide housing which will be available for sale or rent to eligible persons and families upon such terms and in conformity with administrative guidelines established by the authority. With respect to residential housing to be occupied substantially by students, the term "qualified housing sponsor" shall mean a nonprofit educational institution which is not owned or controlled by the state or any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district, or municipality thereof, which provides a program of education beyond the high school level, and which:

(A) Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;

(B) Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree or provides an educational program, admission into which is conditioned upon the prior attainment of a bachelor's degree or its equivalent, for which it awards a postgraduate degree, or provides not less than a two-year program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree; and

(C) Is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association or, if not so accredited, is an institution whose credits are accepted, on transfer, by the university system and its educational units for credit on the same basis as if transferred from an institution so accredited;

provided, however, that a nonprofit educational institution which is otherwise a qualified housing sponsor as defined in this paragraph shall be deemed to be a qualified housing sponsor notwithstanding such institution's maintenance of a special early admission policy for gifted high school students.

(14) "Real property" means all lands, franchises, and interests in land, including lands under water and riparian rights, space rights, and air rights, and any and all other things usually included within such term. The term "real property" shall include any and all interests in such property less than full title, such as easements, incorporeal hereditaments, and every estate or interest or right, legal or equitable, including terms for years.

(15) "Rehabilitation costs" means the total of all costs incurred by eligible households in the rehabilitation of residential housing which are approved by an authority as reasonable and necessary, which costs shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, the following: the cost of site preparation and development; fees for architectural, engineering, legal, accounting, and other services paid or payable in connection with the planning, reconstruction, and financing of residential housing; the cost of necessary surveys, plans, and permits; the cost of insurance, interest, financing, taxes, assessments, and other operating and carrying costs during rehabilitation; the cost of rehabilitation, reconstruction, fixturing, furnishing, and equipping residential housing; the cost of land improvements, including, but not limited to, landscaping and off-site improvements, whether or not any such cost has been paid in cash or in a form other than cash; and the cost of such other items as the authority shall determine to be reasonable and necessary for the rehabilitation of residential housing.

(16) "Residential housing" means any real property and improvement thereon, whether multifamily residential housing or single-family residential housing, within the geographic boundaries of a large municipality activating the authority, which is owned, in whole or in part, by an eligible household or which is providing or shall provide, in whole or in part, dwelling accommodations for eligible households; provided, however, that with respect to multifamily residential housing, such multifamily residential housing shall be deemed to be occupied by eligible households if at least 20 percent of the dwelling units of such multifamily residential housing are occupied by eligible households. The term "residential housing" shall include dormitories, apartment dwellings, or other housing facilities which shall be occupied primarily by students.

(17) "Security interest" means an interest in personal property installed or to be installed in residential housing, which interest secures, in whole or in part, the repayment of a promissory note, the holder of which interest and note is either an authority or a lending institution. The term "security interest" includes all documentation executed in connection with the creation of such interest and specifically includes both the aforesaid promissory note and a security agreement.

(18) "State" means the State of Georgia.

(19) "State aided mortgage" means a mortgage loan for housing for eligible households assisted under this chapter.

(20) "Student" means any individual who possesses a certificate of admission or enrollment at an institution for higher education that is a qualified housing sponsor.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 556, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1985, p. 391, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 150, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1530, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 989, § 3.)

36-41-4. Creation of authority; governing board; filing of resolutions with Secretary of State; filling of vacancies on board; officers; compensation of members of board; promulgation of rules and regulations.

Statute text

There is created in and for each municipality of this state, as defined in paragraph (11) of Code Section 36-41-3, a public body corporate, which shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the state, to be known as the "urban residential finance authority" of such municipality and which shall be governed by a board of not less than seven nor more than nine members. Each member of the board shall be a resident of the large municipality activating the authority. No more than two members of the board may be appointed by the mayor of the large municipality activating the authority with the remaining members appointed by the governing body of the municipality for such term and upon such conditions as specified by resolution of the governing body. Any member of the governing body of the large municipality, the mayor or other chief executive thereof, and the chief fiscal officer thereof may serve on the board. The provisions of Chapter 62A of this title relating to ethics and conflicts of interest shall apply to members of the board of each authority created under this Code section. No authority created under this Code section shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this chapter until the governing body of the large municipality activating the authority, by resolution, declares that there is need for an authority to function in such municipality. A copy of the resolution adopted by the governing body and copies of any resolution adopted by the governing body providing for filling vacancies in the membership of the board of the authority or making any changes in the membership of the board of the authority shall be filed with the Secretary of State. Appointments to fill vacancies on the board of any authority, either for an unexpired or full term as fixed in the original resolution creating the same, shall be made by the governing body of the municipality. The members of the board of each authority shall elect one of their members as chairman and another as vice-chairman and shall also elect a secretary-treasurer, who need not be a member of the board and need not be a resident of the municipality activating such authority. Each member of the board of each authority shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day such member is in attendance at a meeting of the authority, but shall receive the same for not more than 20 meeting days during any one fiscal year. For attendance at any conference in connection with the performance of their official duties, other than a meeting of the authority, members shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred and travel expenses in the same manner as provided by law for members of the General Assembly but shall receive the same for not more than ten days during any one fiscal year. However, if the secretary-treasurer is not a member of the board, then the secretary-treasurer may receive such compensation for his services as may be agreed upon by the members of the board. Each authority shall make rules and regulations for its government and may delegate to one or more of its members or its officers, agents, and employees such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4662, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 337, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1530, § 3.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Expense allowances for General Assembly members, §§ 28-1-8 and 45-7-4.

36-41-5. Powers of authority generally; establishment of administrative guidelines for determination of eligibility.

Statute text

(a) Except as otherwise limited by this chapter, each authority shall have the power:

(1) To bring and defend actions;

(2) To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;

(3) To make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this chapter, including contracts with any agency or authority or nonprofit housing corporation within this state;

(4) To make and alter bylaws for its organization and internal management;

(5) To acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property for its corporate purposes;

(6) To appoint officers, agents, and employees, prescribe their duties and qualifications, and fix their compensation;

(7) To borrow money and to issue bonds, the term of which shall not exceed 40 years, and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

(8) To make loans pursuant to Code Section 36-41-6 for the financing, acquisition, or rehabilitation of residential housing, the repayment of which is secured by mortgages or security interests or other assets and funds of the authority or other security devices determined to be satisfactory by the authority; to participate in the making of loans secured by mortgages or security interests or other security devices determined to be satisfactory by the authority; to undertake commitments to make loans secured by mortgages or security interests or other security devices determined to be satisfactory by the authority; to acquire and, pursuant to Code Section 36-41-7, to contract to acquire mortgages or security interests or participations therein, owned by lending institutions, the Federal National Mortgage Association, or any federal or state agency; and to enter into advance commitments to such organizations for the purchase of such mortgages or security interests or participations;

(9) To sell mortgages and security interests at public or private sale; to negotiate modifications or alterations in mortgages and security interests; to foreclose on any mortgage or security interest in default or commence any action to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by any law, mortgage, security interest, contract, or other agreement; and to bid for and purchase property which was the subject of such mortgage or security interest, at any foreclosure or at any other sale, to acquire or take possession of any such property; and, in the event that the authority takes possession of any such property, to complete, administer, and pay the principal and interest of any obligations incurred in connection with such property and to operate, manage, lease, dispose of, and otherwise deal with such property in such manner as may be necessary or desirable to protect the interests of the authority and the holders of its bonds and other obligations;

(10) To collect fees and charges in connection with its loans, commitments, and servicing, including, but not limited to, reimbursement of costs of financing as the authority shall determine to be reasonable and as shall be approved by the authority;

(11) To make and execute contracts for the servicing of mortgages made or acquired by the authority pursuant to this chapter and to pay the reasonable value of services rendered to the authority pursuant to those contracts;

(12) To accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from the federal government, the state or any county or municipality within the state or any persons or corporations and to agree and comply with any conditions attached to such financial assistance;

(13) Subject to any agreement with bondholders, to invest moneys of the authority not required for immediate use to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the proceeds from the sale of any bonds and any moneys held in reserve funds, in obligations which shall be limited to the following:

(A) Bonds or other obligations of the state or bonds or other obligations, the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the state;

(B) Bonds or other obligations of the United States or of subsidiary corporations of the United States government fully guaranteed by such government;

(C) Obligations of agencies of the United States government issued by the Federal Land Bank, the Federal Home Loan Bank, the Federal Intermediate Credit Bank, and the Bank for Cooperatives;

(D) Bonds or other obligations issued by any public housing agency or municipality in the United States, which bonds or obligations are fully secured as to the payment of bond principal and interest by a pledge of annual contributions under an annual contributions contract or contracts with the United States government, or project notes issued by any public housing agency, urban renewal agency, or municipality in the United States and fully secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a requisition, loan, or payment agreement with the United States government;

(E) Certificates of deposit of national or state banks which have deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Georgia Deposit Insurance Corporation and certificates of deposit of federal savings and loan associations and state building and loan associations which have deposits insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or the Georgia Deposit Insurance Corporation, including the certificates of deposit of any bank, savings and loan association, or building and loan association acting as depository, custodian, or trustee for any such bond proceeds; provided, however, that the portion of such certificates of deposit in excess of the amount insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or the Georgia Deposit Insurance Corporation, if any such excess exists, shall be secured by deposit with the Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta, Georgia, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta, Georgia, or with any national or state bank, of one or more of the following securities in an aggregate principal amount equal at least to the amount of such excess:

(i) Direct or general obligations of the state or of any county or municipality in the state;

(ii) Obligations of the United States or subsidiary corporations included in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;

(iii) Obligations of agencies of the United States government included in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph; or

(iv) Bonds, obligations, or project notes of public housing agencies, urban renewal agencies, or municipalities included in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph;

(F) Interest-bearing time deposits, repurchase agreements, reverse repurchase agreements, rate guarantee agreements, or other similar banking arrangements with a bank or trust company having capital and surplus aggregating at least $50 million or with any government bond dealer reporting to, trading with, and recognized as a primary dealer by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York having capital aggregating at least $50 million or with any corporation which is subject to registration with the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System pursuant to the requirements of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, provided that each such interest-bearing time deposit, repurchase agreement, reverse repurchase agreement, rate guarantee agreement, or other similar banking arrangement shall permit the moneys so placed to be available for use at the time provided with respect to the investment or reinvestment of such moneys; and

(G) Any and all other obligations of investment grade and having a national recognized market including, but not limited to, rate guarantee agreements, guaranteed investment contracts, or other similar arrangements offered by any firm, agency, business, governmental unit, bank, insurance company, or other entity, provided that each such obligation shall permit moneys so placed to be available for use at the time provided with respect to the investment or reinvestment of such moneys;

(14) To make and contract to make loans to lending institutions on such terms and conditions as it shall determine. All lending institutions are authorized to borrow from the authority in accordance with subsection (d) of Code Section 36-41-6 and the administrative guidelines established by the authority pursuant to criteria set forth in this chapter;

(15) To procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets;

(16) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise the powers given and granted in this chapter;

(17) To make loans pursuant to Code Section 36-41-6 to finance the construction of residential housing;

(18) To engage in and assist in the development and operation of low and moderate income housing pursuant to Code Section 8-3-30;

(19) To participate in or administer federal programs for the issuance of mortgage credit and to do all things necessary or convenient to qualify as an issuer of mortgage credit certificates;

(20) To participate in or administer or participate in and administer any federal, state, county, or municipal program designed to assist in lowering the cost of housing for eligible households;

(21) To provide financing for housing projects, without regard to targeting for eligible households, which encourages the development of housing in accordance with the comprehensive development plan of the municipality activating the authority;

(22) To participate, own, lease, develop, operate, or manage residential housing or other real and personal property in cooperation, joint venture, partnership, or other contractual obligations with the federal government, state, or any county or municipality within the state, or any qualified housing sponsor; and

(23) To participate in, issue on behalf of, or jointly issue any bonds, notes, or other obligations with any public housing authority, downtown development authority, or development authority within the state or the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority.

(b) No authority shall have the power of eminent domain.

(c) Each authority shall establish administrative guidelines as to income limitations for eligible households for the purposes of paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-41-3 by taking into account the following considerations, among others determined by the authority to be appropriate:

(1) The size of the family or number of persons who intend to reside together;

(2) The conditions and costs of obtaining and maintaining existing and available housing within the geographic boundaries of the municipality activating the authority;
